Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5915YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2154 Section 1. Section 232.108, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 3 the contrary, this section shall not apply, and the department 4 shall not be required to place a child with a sibling, if all 5 of the following apply: 6 a. The childâs custody, or the siblingâs custody, was 7 previously transferred to the department and the department 8 placed the child or the sibling. 9 b. The department determined that the child and the sibling 10 have little or no established relationship. 11